Illinois, session 104th, SB2160.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Human Services Act is amended 5by adding Section 10-64 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1305/10-64 new)7    Sec. 10-64. Grants to food banks for venison. The 8Department of Human Services shall award grants, in 9consultation with the Department of Natural Resources and 10subject to Section 1.29a of the Wildlife Code, to food banks or 11other entities that provide free food, for the purchase of 12venison or deer meat from food processors or butchers that 13have deer donated by hunters for that purpose. The Department 14of Human Services, in consultation with the Department of 15Natural Resources, shall adopt rules implementing this 16Section. 17    Section 10. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 18Section 5.1030 as follows: 19    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)20    Sec. 5.1030. The Hunter Food Bank Fund.   SB2160- 2 -LRB104 09722 BDA 19788 b1    Section 15. The Wildlife Code is amended by changing 2Sections 1.28, 2.25, 2.26, and 2.37 and by adding Section 31.29a as follows: 4    (520 ILCS 5/1.28)  (from Ch. 61, par. 1.28)5    Sec. 1.28. Fees and fines; deposit in funds. All fees, 6fines, including bond forfeitures, income of whatsoever kind 7or nature derived from hunting and fishing activities on lands 8or waters or both under the jurisdiction or control of the 9Department, and all penalties collected under this Act shall 10be deposited in the State Treasury and shall be set apart in a 11special fund to be known as the "Wildlife and Fish Fund"; 12except that fees derived solely from the sale of salmon 13stamps, income from art contests for the salmon stamp, 14including income from the sale of reprints, and gifts, 15donations, grants and bequests of money for the conservation 16and propagation of salmon shall be deposited in the State 17Treasury and set apart in the special fund to be known as the 18"Salmon Fund"; and except that fees derived solely from the 19sale of state migratory waterfowl stamps, and gifts, 20donations, grants and bequests of money for the conservation 21and propagation of waterfowl shall be deposited in the special 22fund to be known as the "State Migratory Waterfowl Stamp 23Fund"; and except that, fees derived solely from the sale of 24hunter food bank stamps, and gifts, donations, grants, and 25bequests of money for the purpose of having hunters help end   SB2160- 3 -LRB104 09722 BDA 19788 b1hunger in Illinois shall be deposited in the Hunter Food Bank 2Fund; and except that, of fees derived solely from the sale of 3State Habitat Stamps, 64% shall be deposited into the Illinois 4Habitat Fund, 30% into the State Pheasant Fund, and 6% into the 5State Furbearer Fund. Income generated from the sale of 6artwork associated with the State Habitat Stamps shall be 7deposited into the Illinois Habitat Fund. All interest that 8accrues from monies deposited into the Wildlife and Fish Fund, 9the Salmon Fund, the State Migratory Waterfowl Stamp Fund, the 10State Furbearer Fund, the State Pheasant Fund, and the 11Illinois Habitat Fund shall be deposited into those funds, 12respectively. Appropriations from the "Wildlife and Fish Fund" 13shall be made only to the Department for the carrying out of 14the powers and functions vested by law in the Department for 15the administration and management of fish and wildlife 16resources of this State for such activities as the purchase of 17land for fish hatcheries, wildlife refuges, preserves and 18public shooting and fishing grounds; the purchase and 19distribution of wild birds, the eggs of wild birds, and wild 20mammals for rescuing, restoring and distributing fish; the 21maintenance of wildlife refuges, or preserves, public shooting 22grounds, public fishing grounds and fish hatcheries; and the 23feeding and care of wild birds, wild animals and fish.24(Source: P.A. 95-853, eff. 8-18-08.) 25    (520 ILCS 5/1.29a new)  SB2160- 4 -LRB104 09722 BDA 19788 b1    Sec. 1.29a. Hunter Food Bank Stamp; Hunter Food Bank Fund. 2    (a) The Department of Natural Resources shall ensure that 3an optional Hunter Food Bank Stamp is offered to all persons 4and at all locations where deer hunting permits or licenses 5are sold or given under this Code. Each applicant for a Hunter 6Food Bank Stamp shall pay a fee of $10 and shall receive a 7Stamp. All revenue from the sale of Hunter Food Bank Stamps 8shall be deposited into the Hunter Food Bank Fund. The 9Department of Natural Resources shall design the Stamp to 10reflect that the purpose of the Stamp to have hunters help end 11hunger in Illinois. The Department of Natural Resources shall 12publicize and advertise the Hunter Food Bank Stamp for the 13purpose of having hunters help end hunger in Illinois. The 14Department of Natural Resources, in consultation with the 15Department of Human Services, shall adopt rules implementing 16this Section.17    (b) There is hereby created as a special fund in the State 18treasury the Hunter Food Bank Fund. All fees collected from 19the sale of Hunter Food Bank Stamps, and gifts, donations, 20grants, and bequests of money for the purpose of having 21hunters help end hunger in Illinois shall be deposited in this 22Fund. These moneys shall be appropriated to the Department of 23Human Services for the purposes detailed in Section 10-64 of 24the Department of Human Services Act and for no other 25purposes.   SB2160- 5 -LRB104 09722 BDA 19788 b1    (520 ILCS 5/2.25)  (from Ch. 61, par. 2.25)2    Sec. 2.25. It shall be unlawful for any person to take deer 3except (i) with a shotgun, handgun, single shot centerfire 4rifle, or muzzleloading rifle or (ii) as provided by 5administrative rule, with a bow and arrow, during the open 6season of not more than 14 days which will be set annually by 7the Director between the dates of November 1st and December 831st, both inclusive, or a special 3-day, youth-only season 9between the dates of September 1 and October 31. For the 10purposes of this Section, legal handguns and rifles are 11limited to centerfire handguns that are either a single shot 12or revolver and centerfire rifles that are single shot. The 13only legal ammunition for a centerfire handgun or rifle is a 14bottleneck centerfire cartridge of .30 caliber or larger with 15a case length not exceeding one and two-fifths inches, or a 16straight-walled centerfire cartridge of .30 caliber or larger, 17both of which must be available as a factory load with the 18published ballistic tables of the manufacturer showing a 19capability of at least 500 foot pounds of energy at the muzzle. 20The barrel of a handgun shall be at least 4 inches. Full metal 21jacket bullets may not be used to harvest deer.22    The Department shall make administrative rules concerning 23management restrictions applicable to the firearm and bow and 24arrow season.25    It shall be unlawful for any person to take deer except 26with a bow and arrow during the open season for bow and arrow   SB2160- 6 -LRB104 09722 BDA 19788 b1set annually by the Director between the dates of September 21st and January 31st, both inclusive.3    It shall be unlawful for any person to take deer except 4with (i) a muzzleloading rifle or (ii) bow and arrow during the 5open season for muzzleloading rifles set annually by the 6Director.7    The Director shall cause an administrative rule setting 8forth the prescribed rules and regulations, including bag and 9possession limits and those counties of the State where open 10seasons are established, to be published in accordance with 11Sections 1.3 and 1.13 of this Act.12    The Department may establish separate harvest periods for 13the purpose of managing or eradicating disease that has been 14found in the deer herd. This season shall be restricted to gun 15or bow and arrow hunting only. The Department shall publicly 16announce, via statewide news release, the season dates and 17shooting hours, the counties and sites open to hunting.18    The Department is authorized to establish a separate 19harvest period at specific sites within the State for the 20purpose of harvesting surplus deer that cannot be taken during 21the regular season provided for the taking of deer. This 22season shall be restricted to gun or bow and arrow hunting only 23and shall be established during the period of September 1st to 24February 15th, both inclusive. The Department shall publicly 25announce, via statewide news release, the season dates and 26shooting hours, and the counties and sites open to hunting. In   SB2160- 7 -LRB104 09722 BDA 19788 b1determining counties and sites open to hunting within this 2separate harvest period, the Department shall adopt rules that 3will cause the counties and sites selected by the Department 4to be open for hunting during this special harvest period if 5more than 5 deer removal permit requests are made in that 6county under subsection (a) of Section 2.37 during the year 7immediately preceding the beginning of the special harvest 8period. The Department shall publish suitable prescribed rules 9and regulations established by administrative rule pertaining 10to management restrictions applicable to this special harvest 11program. The Department shall allow unused gun deer permits 12that are left over from a regular season for the taking of deer 13to be rolled over and used during any separate harvest period 14held within 6 months of the season for which those tags were 15issued at no additional cost to the permit holder subject to 16the management restrictions applicable to the special harvest 17program. At the request of any individual defined under 18paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subsection (b) of Section 3.1-6 19whose land is not otherwise within any county or site open to 20hunting within the separate harvest period, the Department 21shall transfer to that individual an unused firearm deer 22permit from the regular season for the taking of deer to be 23used during the separate harvest period to hunt upon the 24individual's land only and for the taking of antlerless deer 25only, and that transferred permit shall be transferable in the 26same manner as permits under Section 3.1-6.   SB2160- 8 -LRB104 09722 BDA 19788 b1    Beginning July 1, 2019, and on an annual basis thereafter, 2the Department shall provide a report to the General Assembly 3providing information regarding deer management programs 4established by the Code or by administrative rule that 5includes: (1) the number of surplus deer taken during each 6separate harvest season; (2) the number of deer found to have a 7communicable disease or other abnormality; and (3) what 8happens to the deer taken during each separate harvest season. 9(Source: P.A. 101-66, eff. 7-12-19; 102-314, eff. 1-1-22; 10102-932, eff. 1-1-23.) 11    (520 ILCS 5/2.26)  (from Ch. 61, par. 2.26)12    Sec. 2.26. Deer hunting permits. Any person attempting to 13take deer shall first obtain a "Deer Hunting Permit" issued by 14the Department in accordance with its administrative rules. 15Those rules must provide for the issuance of the following 16types of resident deer archery permits: (i) a combination 17permit, consisting of one either-sex permit and one 18antlerless-only permit, (ii) a single antlerless-only permit, 19and (iii) a single either-sex permit. The fee for a Deer 20Hunting Permit to take deer with either bow and arrow or gun 21shall not exceed $25 for residents of the State. The 22Department may by administrative rule provide for non-resident 23deer hunting permits for which the fee will not exceed $300 in 242005, $350 in 2006, and $400 in 2007 and thereafter except as 25provided below for non-resident landowners and non-resident   SB2160- 9 -LRB104 09722 BDA 19788 b1archery hunters. The Department may by administrative rule 2provide for a non-resident archery deer permit consisting of 3not more than 2 harvest tags at a total cost not to exceed $325 4in 2005, $375 in 2006, and $425 in 2007 and thereafter. The 5fees for a youth resident and non-resident archery deer permit 6shall be the same. 7    The Department shall create a pilot program during the 8special 3-day, youth-only deer hunting season to allow for 9youth deer hunting permits that are valid statewide, excluding 10those counties or portions of counties closed to firearm deer 11hunting. The Department shall adopt rules to implement the 12pilot program. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to 13prohibit the Department from issuing Special Hunt Area Permits 14for the youth-only deer hunting season or establishing, 15through administrative rule, additional requirements 16pertaining to the youth-only deer hunting season on 17Department-owned or Department-managed sites, including 18site-specific quotas or drawings. The provisions of this 19paragraph are inoperative on and after January 1, 2023.20    The standards and specifications for use of guns and bow 21and arrow for deer hunting shall be established by 22administrative rule.23    No person may have in his or her possession any firearm not 24authorized by administrative rule for a specific hunting 25season when taking deer unless in accordance with the Firearm 26Concealed Carry Act.  SB2160- 10 -LRB104 09722 BDA 19788 b1    Persons having a firearm deer hunting permit shall be 2permitted to take deer only during the period from 1/2 hour 3before sunrise to 1/2 hour after sunset, and only during those 4days for which an open season is established for the taking of 5deer by use of shotgun, handgun, rifle, or muzzle loading 6rifle.7    Persons having an archery deer hunting permit shall be 8permitted to take deer only during the period from 1/2 hour 9before sunrise to 1/2 hour after sunset, and only during those 10days for which an open season is established for the taking of 11deer by use of bow and arrow.12    It shall be unlawful for any person to take deer by use of 13dogs, horses, automobiles, aircraft, or other vehicles, or by 14the use or aid of bait or baiting of any kind. For the purposes 15of this Section, "bait" means any material, whether liquid or 16solid, including food, salt, minerals, and other products, 17except pure water, that can be ingested, placed, or scattered 18in such a manner as to attract or lure white-tailed deer. 19"Baiting" means the placement or scattering of bait to attract 20deer. An area is considered as baited during the presence of 21and for 10 consecutive days following the removal of bait. 22Nothing in this Section shall prohibit the use of a dog to 23track wounded deer. Any person using a dog for tracking 24wounded deer must maintain physical control of the dog at all 25times by means of a maximum 50-foot 50 foot lead attached to 26the dog's collar or harness. Tracking wounded deer is   SB2160- 11 -LRB104 09722 BDA 19788 b1permissible at night, but at no time outside of legal deer 2hunting hours or seasons shall any person handling or 3accompanying a dog being used for tracking wounded deer be in 4possession of any firearm or archery device. Persons tracking 5wounded deer with a dog during the firearm deer seasons shall 6wear blaze orange or solid blaze pink color as required. Dog 7handlers tracking wounded deer with a dog are exempt from 8hunting license and deer permit requirements so long as they 9are accompanied by the licensed deer hunter who wounded the 10deer.11    It shall be unlawful to possess or transport any wild deer 12which has been injured or killed in any manner upon a public 13highway or public right-of-way of this State unless exempted 14by administrative rule.15    Persons hunting deer must have the gun unloaded and no bow 16and arrow device shall be carried with the arrow in the nocked 17position during hours when deer hunting is unlawful.18    It shall be unlawful for any person, having taken the 19legal limit of deer by gun, to further participate with a gun 20in any deer hunting party, except when filling antlerless tags 21or using an either-sex permit to take an antlerless deer.22    It shall be unlawful for any person, having taken the 23legal limit of deer by bow and arrow, to further participate 24with bow and arrow in any deer hunting party, except when 25filling antlerless tags or using an either-sex permit to take 26an antlerless deer.  SB2160- 12 -LRB104 09722 BDA 19788 b1    The Department may prohibit upland game hunting during the 2gun deer season by administrative rule.3    The Department shall not limit the number of non-resident, 4either-sex archery deer hunting permits to less than 20,000. 5    Any person who violates any of the provisions of this 6Section, including administrative rules, shall be guilty of a 7Class B misdemeanor.8    For the purposes of calculating acreage under this 9Section, the Department shall, after determining the total 10acreage of the applicable tract or tracts of land, round 11remaining fractional portions of an acre greater than or equal 12to half of an acre up to the next whole acre. 13    For the purposes of taking white-tailed deer, nothing in 14this Section shall be construed to prevent the manipulation, 15including mowing or cutting, of standing crops as a normal 16agricultural or soil stabilization practice, food plots, or 17normal agricultural practices, including planting, harvesting, 18and maintenance such as cultivating or the use of products 19designed for scent only and not capable of ingestion, solid or 20liquid, placed or scattered, in such a manner as to attract or 21lure deer. Such manipulation for the purpose of taking 22white-tailed deer may be further modified by administrative 23rule. 24(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-444, eff. 6-1-20; 25102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-932, eff. 1-1-23; revised 10-23-24.)   SB2160- 13 -LRB104 09722 BDA 19788 b1    (520 ILCS 5/2.37)  (from Ch. 61, par. 2.37)2    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-611)3    Sec. 2.37. Authority to kill wildlife responsible for 4damage. 5    (a) Subject to federal regulations and Section 3 of the 6Illinois Endangered Species Protection Act, the Department may 7authorize owners and tenants of lands or their agents, who are 8performing the service without fee or compensation, to remove 9or destroy any wild bird or wild mammal when the wild bird or 10wild mammal is known to be destroying property or causing a 11risk to human health or safety upon his or her land.12    Upon receipt by the Department of information from the 13owner, tenant, or sharecropper that any one or more species of 14wildlife is damaging dams, levees, ditches, cattle pastures, 15or other property on the land on which he resides or controls, 16together with a statement regarding location of the property 17damages, the nature and extent of the damage, and the 18particular species of wildlife committing the damage, the 19Department shall make an investigation.20    If, after investigation, the Department finds that damage 21does exist and can be abated only by removing or destroying 22that wildlife, a permit shall be issued by the Department to 23remove or destroy the species responsible for causing the 24damage.25    A permit to control the damage shall be for a period of up 26to 90 days, shall specify the means and methods by which and   SB2160- 14 -LRB104 09722 BDA 19788 b1the person or persons by whom the wildlife may be removed or 2destroyed, without fee or compensation, and shall set forth 3the disposition procedure to be made of all wildlife taken and 4other restrictions the Director considers necessary and 5appropriate in the circumstances of the particular case. 6Whenever possible, the specimens destroyed shall be given to a 7bona fide public or State scientific, educational, or 8zoological institution.9    The permittee shall advise the Department in writing, 10within 10 days after the expiration date of the permit, of the 11number of individual species of wildlife taken, disposition 12made of them, and any other information which the Department 13may consider necessary.14    (b) Subject to federal regulations and Section 3 of the 15Illinois Endangered Species Protection Act, the Department may 16grant the authority to control species protected by this Code 17pursuant to the issuance of a Nuisance Wildlife Control Permit 18to:19        (1) any person who is providing such service for a fee 20    or compensation; 21        (2) a governmental body; or22        (3) a nonprofit or other charitable organization.23    The Department shall set forth applicable regulations in 24an Administrative Order and may require periodic reports 25listing species taken, numbers of each species taken, dates 26when taken, and other pertinent information.  SB2160- 15 -LRB104 09722 BDA 19788 b1    Any person operating under a Nuisance Wildlife Control 2Permit who subcontracts the operation of nuisance wildlife 3control to another shall ensure that such subcontractor 4possesses a valid Nuisance Wildlife Control Permit issued by 5the Department. The person must maintain a record of the 6subcontractor including the subcontractor's name, address, and 7phone number, and type of work to be performed, for a period of 8not less than 2 years from the date the subcontractor is no 9longer performing services on behalf of the person. The 10records shall be presented to an authorized employee of the 11Department or law enforcement officer upon request for 12inspection. 13    Any person operating without the required permit as 14outlined under this subsection (b) or in violation of this 15subsection (b) is deemed to be taking, attempting to take, 16disturbing, or harassing wildlife contrary to the provisions 17of this Code, including the taking or attempting to take such 18species for commercial purposes as outlined in Sections 2.36 19and 2.36a of this Code. Any devices and equipment, including 20vehicles, used in violation of this subsection (b) may be 21subject to the provisions of Section 1.25 of this Code. 22    (c) The location of traps or snares authorized under this 23Section, either by the Department or any other governmental 24body with the authority to control species protected by this 25Code, shall be exempt from the provisions of the Freedom of 26Information Act.   SB2160- 16 -LRB104 09722 BDA 19788 b1    (d) A drainage district or road district or the designee 2of a drainage district or road district shall be exempt from 3the requirement to obtain a permit to control nuisance 4muskrats or beavers if all applicable provisions for licenses 5are complied with and any trap types and sizes used are in 6compliance with this Code, including marking or 7identification. The designee of a drainage district or road 8district must have a signed and dated written authorization 9from the drainage district or road district in possession at 10all times when conducting activities under this Section. This 11exemption from obtaining a permit shall be valid only upon 12property owned, leased, or controlled by the drainage district 13or road district. For the purposes of this Section, "road 14district" includes a township road district. 15(Source: P.A. 102-524, eff. 8-20-21; 103-37, eff. 6-9-23; 16103-225, eff. 6-30-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 17    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-611)18    Sec. 2.37. Authority to kill wildlife responsible for 19damage. 20    (a) Subject to federal regulations and Section 3 of the 21Illinois Endangered Species Protection Act, the Department may 22authorize owners and tenants of lands or their agents, who are 23performing the service without fee or compensation, to remove 24or destroy any wild bird or wild mammal when the wild bird or 25wild mammal is known to be destroying property or causing a   SB2160- 17 -LRB104 09722 BDA 19788 b1risk to human health or safety upon his or her land.2    Upon receipt by the Department of information from the 3owner, tenant, or sharecropper that any one or more species of 4wildlife is damaging dams, levees, ditches, cattle pastures, 5or other property on the land on which he resides or controls, 6together with a statement regarding location of the property 7damages, the nature and extent of the damage, and the 8particular species of wildlife committing the damage, the 9Department shall make an investigation.10    If, after investigation, the Department finds that damage 11does exist and can be abated only by removing or destroying 12that wildlife, a permit shall be issued by the Department to 13remove or destroy the species responsible for causing the 14damage.15    A permit to control the damage shall be for a period of up 16to 90 days, except as provided in subsection (a-5), shall 17specify the means and methods by which and the person or 18persons by whom the wildlife may be removed or destroyed, 19without fee or compensation, and shall set forth the 20disposition procedure to be made of all wildlife taken and 21other restrictions the Director considers necessary and 22appropriate in the circumstances of the particular case. 23Whenever possible, the specimens destroyed shall be given to a 24bona fide public or State scientific, educational, or 25zoological institution.26    The permittee shall advise the Department in writing,   SB2160- 18 -LRB104 09722 BDA 19788 b1within 10 days after the expiration date of the permit, of the 2number of individual species of wildlife taken, disposition 3made of them, and any other information which the Department 4may consider necessary.5    (a-5) The holder of a deer removal permit issued by the 6Department under subsection (a) of this Section may transfer 7the permit to any individual who is at least 18 years of age 8and holds a certificate of competency issued by the Department 9for successfully completing a hunter safety course authorized 10by the Department. The Department shall make publicly 11available on its website applications for deer removal permits 12to be issued under subsection (a) and instructions on how to 13apply for those permits. The Department shall acknowledge 14receipt of each application for a deer removal permit within 15one business day after its receipt and shall complete any 16investigation required under subsection (a) and issue or deny 17the requested deer removal permit within 5 business days after 18receipt of the application. In the event of failure to deny an 19application for a deer removal permit within 5 business days 20after receipt of the application, the application shall be 21deemed approved. A deer removal permit issued by the 22Department under subsection (a) is valid from the date of its 23issuance until December 31 of the same calendar year. 24    (b) Subject to federal regulations and Section 3 of the 25Illinois Endangered Species Protection Act, the Department may 26grant the authority to control species protected by this Code   SB2160- 19 -LRB104 09722 BDA 19788 b1pursuant to the issuance of a Nuisance Wildlife Control Permit 2to:3        (1) any person who is providing such service or 4    solicits customers for themselves or on behalf of a 5    nuisance wildlife control permit holder for a fee or 6    compensation; 7        (2) a governmental body; or8        (3) a nonprofit or other charitable organization.9    The Department shall set forth applicable regulations in 10an Administrative Order and may require periodic reports 11listing species taken, numbers of each species taken, dates 12when taken, and other pertinent information.13    Any person operating under a Nuisance Wildlife Control 14Permit who subcontracts the operation of nuisance wildlife 15control to another shall ensure that such subcontractor 16possesses a valid Nuisance Wildlife Control Permit issued by 17the Department. The person must maintain a record of the 18subcontractor including the subcontractor's name, address, and 19phone number, and type of work to be performed, for a period of 20not less than 2 years from the date the subcontractor is no 21longer performing services on behalf of the person. The 22records shall be presented to an authorized employee of the 23Department or law enforcement officer upon request for 24inspection. 25    Any person operating without the required permit as 26outlined under this subsection (b) or in violation of this   SB2160- 20 -LRB104 09722 BDA 19788 b1subsection (b) is deemed to be taking, attempting to take, 2disturbing, or harassing wildlife contrary to the provisions 3of this Code, including the taking or attempting to take such 4species for commercial purposes as outlined in Sections 2.36 5and 2.36a of this Code. Any devices and equipment, including 6vehicles, used in violation of this subsection (b) may be 7subject to the provisions of Section 1.25 of this Code. 8    Any person properly permitted and operating under the 9provisions of this subsection is exempt from the provisions of 10this Act except as limited by administrative rule adopted by 11the Department. 12    (c) The location of traps or snares authorized under this 13Section, either by the Department or any other governmental 14body with the authority to control species protected by this 15Code, shall be exempt from the provisions of the Freedom of 16Information Act. 17    (d) A drainage district or road district or the designee 18of a drainage district or road district shall be exempt from 19the requirement to obtain a permit to control nuisance 20muskrats or beavers if all applicable provisions for licenses 21are complied with and any trap types and sizes used are in 22compliance with this Code, including marking or 23identification. The designee of a drainage district or road 24district must have a signed and dated written authorization 25from the drainage district or road district in possession at 26all times when conducting activities under this Section. This   SB2160- 21 -LRB104 09722 BDA 19788 b1exemption from obtaining a permit shall be valid only upon 2property owned, leased, or controlled by the drainage district 3or road district. For the purposes of this Section, "road 4district" includes a township road district. 5(Source: P.A. 102-524, eff. 8-20-21; 103-37, eff. 6-9-23; 6103-225, eff. 6-30-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-611, eff. 71-1-25.) 8    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 9changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 10that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 11represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 12not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 13made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 14Public Act.  SB2160- 22 -LRB104 09722 BDA 19788 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    20 ILCS 1305/10-64 new4    30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new5    520 ILCS 5/1.28from Ch. 61, par. 1.286    520 ILCS 5/1.29a new7    520 ILCS 5/2.25from Ch. 61, par. 2.258    520 ILCS 5/2.26from Ch. 61, par. 2.269    520 ILCS 5/2.37from Ch. 61, par. 2.37